Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 4190, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4190. A. The Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services is authorized to approve and administer child
care centers for minor dependents of state employees, and may
provide consultation to state agencies regarding child care centers.
B. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services, the
Department of Human Services, and the Oklahoma State Department of
Health are directed to assist the Director of the Office of

Req. No. 11086 Page 1

Mana gement and Enterprise Services in the implementation of Sections
4190 through 4192 of this title.
C. The Director is authorized to promulgate any rules necessary
for the establishment and implementation of Sections 4190 through
4192 of this title.
D. Individuals employed by the State of Oklahoma who have minor
dependents shall be eligible for the Child Care Subsidy Program
administered by the Department of Human Services.
E. Licensed spaces in the child care centers shall be open to
all eligible children, including those individuals not employed by
the State of Oklahoma and those financially eligible for Department
of Human Services child care assistance. However, minor dependents
of state employees shall be given highest priority and children
financially eligible for Department of Human Services child care
assistance second priority for all vacant spaces.
E. F. The Director shall approve rates for child care
consistent with the rates of the industry within the geographic
area.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11086 CMA 12/18/24



Req. No. 11086 Page 2